Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2311.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2322(a)(2) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2322. Prohibited devices and methods.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this title or commission regulation, no person shall hunt, kill or take or attempt, aid, abet, assist or conspire to hunt, kill or take any big game, except wild turkey, with any of the following devices or methods:* * *(2) Any automatic or semiautomatic firearm, except [that] any semiautomatic firearm modified to permit one shell in the chamber and no more than [four] five shells in a magazine [may be used by a person who suffered an amputation 123456789101112131415161718 or lost the total use of one or both hands].* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2311PN3043 - 2 - 123